Utah statutes.
34A-1-402.   Publication of orders, rules, and rates.

(1) (a)  The commission shall make available in proper form for distribution to the public, its orders and rules; and

(b)  furnish the information made available under Subsection (1) to any person upon request.

(2)  The commission may in accordance with Section 63G-2-203 charge a fee for furnishing materials under this section.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

